Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2573.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; UNIVERSITY OF ST. THOMAS CENTER FOR MICROGRID RESEARCH.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, paragraph (j), $1,200,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the renewable development account established in Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, to the commissioner of commerce for a grant to the University of St. Thomas Center for Microgrid Research for the purposes of paragraph (b). This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin (b) The appropriations in paragraph (a) must be used by the University of St. Thomas Center for Microgrid Research to: new text end new text begin (1) increase the center's capacity to provide industry partners opportunities to test near-commercial microgrid products on a real-world scale and to multiply opportunities for innovative research; new text end new text begin (2) procure advanced equipment and controls to enable the extension of the university's microgrid to additional buildings; and new text end new text begin (3) expand hands-on educational opportunities for traditional and nontraditional students and the center's outreach activities to increase understanding of microgrid operations. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION EXTENSION.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, and Laws 2023, chapter 60, article 11, section 2, subdivision 3, paragraph (c), the availability of the fiscal year 2024 and fiscal year 2025 appropriations for grants to the University of St. Thomas Center for Microgrid Research in Laws 2023, chapter 60, article 11, section 2, subdivision 3, are extended to June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end